Utah statutes.
63G-6-907.   Resolution of local public procurement controversies.
Any local public procurement unit is authorized to enter into an agreement
with the State Procurement Appeals Board to resolve controversies between the
local public procurement unit and its contractors, whether or not such
controversy arose from a cooperative purchasing agreement.
